Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Chapter 10

Well Drilling

69-10-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of ground water management;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner's duly authorized representative and, in the event of the commissioner's absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner of environment and conservation;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Drill” means to dig, drill, redrill, construct, deepen or alter a well;

“Geothermal well” means a hole drilled into the earth, by boring or otherwise, greater than twenty feet (20') in depth constructed for the primary purpose of adding or removing British Thermal Units (BTUs) from the earth for heating or cooling;

“Inactive well” means any well that is not in use and that does not have functioning equipment, including bailers, associated either with or attached to the well;

“Installer” means any person who installs or repairs well pumps or who installs filters and water treatment devices;

“Log” means a record of the consolidated or unconsolidated formation penetrated in the drilling of a well, and includes general information concerning construction of a well;

“Monitoring well” means a hole drilled into the earth, by boring or otherwise, constructed for the primary purpose of obtaining information on the elevation or physical, chemical, radiological or biological characteristics of the ground water or for the recovery of ground water for treatment, or both;

“Person” means any individual, organization, group, association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, utility district, state or local government agency or any combination of them;

“Water well” means a hole drilled into the earth, by boring or otherwise, for the production of water;

“Well” means one of these three (3) types of holes in the earth: a geothermal well, a monitoring well, or a water well; and

“Well owner” means the person who owns the real property on which a well exists or is to be drilled; provided, however, that in the case of any monitoring or remediation required by the department or the commissioner, the well owner shall be the person responsible for such monitoring or remediation.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2301; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 1; 1986, ch. 611, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2002, ch. 800, § 12; T.C.A. §69-11-101.

Law Reviews.

1963 Tennessee Survey, 17 Vand. L. Rev. 977, 1124.

69-10-102. Well driller's and installer's licenses required.

It is unlawful for any well to be drilled or closed except by licensed individuals. In order to obtain a water well, a monitoring well or a geothermal well driller's license, an individual shall file with the commissioner, on or before July 31 of each year, an application form to be made available by the commissioner, with the following information:

The name under which the individual is doing business in this state;

The office address or principal place of business of the individual; and

Such other information as the commissioner may deem reasonable and necessary.

Each applicant for one of the three (3) types of well driller's license shall submit the required fee to the commissioner with the application. The amount of the application fee for each annual license shall not exceed the amount stated in § 68-203-103(h) and shall be set in a rule promulgated by the commissioner. The payment of the fee shall be in lieu of any additional state or county privilege tax. Upon finding that the applicant meets all requirements for the license, the commissioner shall issue the license for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

An individual may apply for more than one of the three (3) types of well driller's licenses and may apply for a pump installer or water treatment installer license, or both, by applying for all licenses desired and paying the required fees.

It is unlawful, except if it is done by a licensed individual:

To engage in the business of installing, removing or repairing geothermal wells or water well pumps or drop lines in geothermal wells or water wells; or

To engage in the business of repairing, servicing or installing filters and water treatment devices on geothermal wells or water wells.

In order to obtain a license to install pumps or to install filters and treatment devices in geothermal wells or water wells, an individual shall annually file with the commissioner, on or before July 31 of each year, an application form made available by the commissioner, with the following information:

The name under which the individual is doing business in this state;

The office address or principal place of business of the individual; and

Such other information as the commissioner may deem reasonable and necessary.

Each applicant for a pump installer or a water treatment installer license, or both, shall submit the required annual fee to the commissioner with the application. The amount of the application fee for each of these annual licenses shall not exceed the amount stated in § 68-203-103(h) and shall be set in a rule promulgated by the commissioner. Upon finding that the applicant meets all requirements for the license, the commissioner shall issue the license for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

Each licensee individually shall obtain continuing education credits, as determined by the commissioner and established by rules promulgated under this chapter, during each twelve-month period beginning on August 1, 2003.

Reciprocity to well drillers and installers licensed in other states will be granted by the department, provided the applicant meets the requirements as required under this chapter.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 2; 1967, ch. 319, § 1; 1972, ch. 828, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2302; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 2; 1986, ch. 611, § 2; 2002, ch. 800, § 13; T.C.A. §69-11-102; Acts 2007, ch. 362, §§ 38, 39.

69-10-103. Drilling requirements — Inspections.

It is unlawful, and a violation of this chapter, for any person to drill a water well or geothermal well within this state, unless the following provisions are complied with:

The driller of such well shall be licensed as provided in § 69-10-102;

The driller shall, at all times during the drilling of such well, keep posted in a conspicuous location, at or near the well being drilled, a copy of the appropriate license; and

The driller of a water well or geothermal well, after the completion of the drilling of each well, shall deliver to the commissioner upon forms to be supplied by the commissioner, a report of well driller by a date determined by the commissioner to contain at least the following information:

The name and address of the well owner;

The location of the well;

The date upon which the well was completed; and

The log of the well.

The commissioner shall have the authority to inspect and approve or disapprove, based on the requirements of this chapter, the drilling of any water well or geothermal well, the installation and repair of well pumps or water treatment devices, the installation and repair of all conduits, valves, or other appurtenances that convey water between the well and any building, structure or any water discharge point.

All water wells and geothermal wells shall be drilled, dug, constructed, altered, maintained, and closed in accordance with all standards and requirements established by rules promulgated under this chapter.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 3; 1973, ch. 346, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2303; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 3; 1988, ch. 892, § 1; 2002, ch. 800, § 14; T.C.A. §69-11-103.

Law Reviews.

Updating Tennessee's Public Records Law (Douglas Pierce), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

69-10-104. Supervision by licensed driller required.

It shall be unlawful to operate or install any equipment in the drilling of geothermal, water or monitoring wells unless a licensed individual, or an operator designated by the licensee, supervises the activity.

It shall be unlawful to install any pumps or water treatment devices in geothermal wells and water wells unless a licensed individual, or an operator designated by the licensee, supervises the activity.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 4; T.C.A., § 70-2304; Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 15; T.C.A. §69-11-104.

69-10-105. Suspension and revocation of well drilling or installer's licenses.

A license or operator card may be refused, or a license or operator card duly issued may be suspended or revoked, or the renewal of the license or operator card refused by the commissioner, upon a finding that the applicant or holder:

Intentionally made a material misstatement in the application for the license;

Willfully violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter;

Obtained, or attempted to obtain, the license by fraud or misrepresentation;

Been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices;

Demonstrated lack of competence as a driller of wells or as an installer;

Has failed to comply with an order or assessment issued by the commissioner; or

Has been convicted of a felony for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the fitness of the applicant or holder to practice competently, as determined by the commissioner.

All actions pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

No licensee whose license has been revoked under this section is entitled to file another application for a license as a well driller or as an installer within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation, or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of the final court order or decree affirming such revocation. Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner, unless the applicant shows good cause why revocation of the license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 5; 1982, ch. 653, § 3; T.C.A., § 70-2305; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 4; 1986, ch. 611, § 3; 2002, ch. 800, §§ 11, 16, 17; T.C.A. §69-11-105; Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which amended this section, shall take effect on April 6, 2016 and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

69-10-106. Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power to:

Promulgate rules and regulations as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

Make inspections and investigations, collect samples, carry on research, or take such other action as may be necessary to carry out this chapter, rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter, and any orders that the commissioner may issue;

Enter or authorize the commissioner's agents to enter at all reasonable times upon any property other than dwelling places for the purpose of conducting investigations or studies or enforcing any of the provisions of this chapter;

Bring suit in the name of the department for any violation of this chapter, rules and regulations, and orders of the commissioner seeking any remedy provided in such chapter, rules and regulations, and orders, as well as, any other statutory or common law remedy provided in statutory or common law;

Assess civil penalties for violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, standard adopted or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter;

Issue orders as may be necessary to secure compliance with this chapter, as well as the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter;

Investigate any alleged or apparent violation of this chapter and to take any action authorized under this chapter as the commissioner deems necessary to enforce this chapter;

Issue licenses as provided by this chapter;

Establish standards for installation of pumps and treatment devices and establish standards for the proper drilling, construction, maintenance, and closure by well drillers, including, but not limited to, the casing, perforating, plugging, cementing, and capping of wells and for maintenance of water wells and geothermal wells by well owners; and

Require corrective action, including closure, of all inactive wells or improperly constructed or maintained wells that have caused or will cause harm to ground water.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 6; T.C.A., § 70-2306; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 5; 2002, ch. 800, § 18; T.C.A. §69-11-106.

69-10-107. Board of ground water management.

In order to advise and assist the commissioner in the preparation of rules and regulations, there is hereby created and established an advisory board to be known as the board of ground water management, consisting of five (5) members, including the commissioner and director of water resources or their designees, who shall be ex officio members of the board, and three (3) persons actively engaged in the drilling of wells, and one (1) of whom shall be resident of each of the three (3) geographical grand divisions of the state, and shall be appointed by the governor for terms of three (3) years each. The first well driller appointed to the board from:

Middle Tennessee shall serve for a term of three (3) years from and after the date of appointment;

East Tennessee shall serve for a term of two (2) years from and after the date of appointment; and

West Tennessee shall serve for a term of one (1) year from and after the date of appointment.

Thereafter, upon the expiration of the term of any members of the board engaged in well drilling, a successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of three (3) years, the appointees shall be residents of Tennessee, and holders of certificates as well drillers issued under this chapter or prior acts, and each appointee shall have been actively engaged in well drilling in this state for not less than five (5) years next preceding appointment. No appointive member shall be appointed to more than two (2) consecutive full terms.

Any vacancy on the board, which may occur from any cause, shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term in the same manner as regular appointments are made, and the dates of tenure of office as provided in subsection (a) shall be maintained.

The commissioner shall serve as chair and the director of water resources shall serve as secretary of the board, which shall meet at least once annually at a time and place determined by the board. A quorum consists of three (3) members of the board. The board members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall adopt and implement rules and regulations to create a conflict of interest policy for board members. The policy shall mandate annual written disclosures of financial interests, other possible conflicts of interest, and an acknowledgement by board members that they have read and understand all aspects of the policy. The policy shall also require persons who are to be appointed to the board to acknowledge, as a condition of appointment, that they are not in conflict with the conditions of the policy.

Prior to the issuance of any well driller's license or any installer's license, the board of ground water resources shall review the application for such license and shall make a recommendation to the commissioner either for or against issuance of such license. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, that specify the criteria to be used by the board in making such recommendations.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 7; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(20); 1982, ch. 653, § 4; T.C.A., § 70-2307; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 6; 1986, ch. 611, § 4; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2002, ch. 800, §§ 11, 20; T.C.A. §69-11-107; Acts 2012, ch. 808, § 3; 2014, ch. 624, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The board of ground water management, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

69-10-108. [Reserved.]

All funds received by the commissioner under this chapter, together with any interest earned on the funds, shall be deposited into a separate account in the environmental protection fund created by §68-203-101.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 9; T.C.A., § 70-2309; Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 22; T.C.A. §69-11-109; Acts 2007, ch. 362, § 40.

69-10-110. Violations — Enforcement — Penalties.

Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that a violation of this chapter or regulations pursuant to this chapter has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, the commissioner may cause a written complaint to be delivered to the alleged violator or violators. The complaint shall specify the provision or provisions of this chapter, regulation, or order alleged to be violated or about to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute a violation of this chapter, regulation, or order, may order that corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order, and shall inform the violators of the opportunity for a hearing.

Any such order shall become final and not subject to review unless the person or persons named in the order request by written petition a hearing no later than thirty (30) days after the date such order is delivered; provided, that the commissioner may review such final order, on the same grounds upon which a court of the state may review default judgments.

The commissioner, upon finding that the public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires immediate action, may, without prior notice, or without preceding the action with a hearing, issue an order requiring that such action be taken as the commissioner deems necessary under the circumstances. A person to whom such an order is directed shall comply immediately pending the opportunity for a prompt hearing.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice, complaint, order, or other instrument issued by or under authority of this chapter may be served on any person by the commissioner or any person designated by the commissioner, by certified mail, or in accordance with Tennessee statutes authorizing service of process in civil actions.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this chapter, any order of the commissioner issued pursuant to this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or standard adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each day of violation. Each day such violation continues is a separate violation. In addition, such person shall also be liable for any damages to the state resulting from the violation, without regard to whether any civil penalty is assessed.

Any civil penalty or damages shall be assessed in the following manner:

The commissioner may issue an assessment against any person responsible for the violation or damages;

Any person against whom an assessment has been issued may secure a review of such assessment by filing with the commissioner a written petition setting forth the grounds and reasons for the objections and asking for a hearing in the matter involved. If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final; and

Whenever any assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal the commissioner's assessment, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of such judgment. The court, in such proceedings, shall treat the failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment.

In assessing a civil penalty, the following factors may be considered:

The harm done or potential for harm to the public health or the environment;

Whether the civil penalty imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the illegal activity;

The economic benefit gained by the violator;

The amount of effort put forth by the violator to remedy this violation; and

Any unusual or extraordinary enforcement costs incurred by the commissioner.

Damages to the state may include any reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and enforcing violations of this chapter, or any other actual damages caused by the violation.

Any person violating, or failing, neglecting, or refusing to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or rules or regulations commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day upon which such violation occurs is a separate offense.

No warrant, presentment, or indictment arising under this chapter shall be issued except upon application by the commissioner or upon such application authorized in writing.

Any hearing or rehearing brought before the commissioner shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

When there is reason to believe that a person has violated, or is about to violate, any of the provisions of this chapter or any license or orders issued under this chapter, the commissioner may institute proceedings in the appropriate court for injunctive relief.

Acts 1963, ch. 325, § 10; T.C.A., § 70-2310; Acts 1984, ch. 784, § 7; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A. §69-11-110.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-10-111. Notice of intent to drill.

No water well or geothermal well shall be drilled unless the well owner or the well driller, on behalf of the well owner, has previously notified the commissioner of the intent to drill a well in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. The notice of intent to drill shall include, at a minimum, the name and address of the owner and the location of the well. The fee for the notification shall be submitted by the well owner or the well driller in accordance with the requirements of the rules but no later than the report of well driller pursuant to §69-10-103.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 19; T.C.A. §69-11-111.

69-10-112. Municipalities under home rule or counties under charter — Exemptions.

Any municipality that has adopted home rule under Tennessee Constitution, Article XI, § 9, or any county operating under a county charter form of government, may enact, by ordinance or resolution respectively, enforceable requirements not less stringent than the standards adopted by the state pursuant to this chapter.

Any such municipality that has adopted home rule under Tennessee Constitution, Article XI, § 9, any county operating under a county charter form of government, or any political subdivision under such municipality or county, may be exempted from this chapter, except for the well driller licensing and license fee provisions that shall remain as a state function. Any such municipality, county or political subdivision desiring to be exempted from this chapter may file a petition for certificate of exemption with the commissioner. The commissioner shall grant or deny the petition.

The certificate of exemption shall be granted if the commissioner determines that the home rule municipality, or county operating under a county charter form of government, has enacted provisions not less stringent than this chapter and that such enactments are being, or will be, adequately enforced.

The commissioner may grant a certificate of exemption in whole or in part, may prescribe a time schedule for various parts of an exemption to become effective, and may make a certificate of exemption conditional or provisional as is deemed appropriate.

In granting any certificate of exemption, there is reserved to the state the right to initiate proceedings to enforce any applicable resolution, ordinance or regulation of the municipality or county should it fail to obtain compliance with the resolution, ordinance or regulation. Such proceedings shall be the same as for enforcement of any duly promulgated rule or regulation.

In granting any certificate of exemption, the exemption is to be strictly construed as limited to the language of the exemption. No power or authority that is not expressly stated in the certificate of exemption may be implied.

The department shall frequently determine whether or not any exempted municipality, county or political subdivision meets the terms of the exemption granted and continues to comply with this section. If a determination is made that such municipality, county or political subdivision does not meet the terms of the exemption granted or does not comply with this section, the commissioner, upon reasonable notice to the municipality, county or political subdivision, may suspend the exemption in whole or in part until such time as the municipality, county or political subdivision complies with the state standards.

All certificates of exemption, including those expiring pursuant to subsection (g), shall be for a fixed term not to exceed five (5) years.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 23; T.C.A. §69-11-112.

69-10-109. Disbursement of moneys.